New York, session 2025-2026, S5475.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (g) of subdivision 2 of 2 section 3-c of the general municipal law, as added by section 1 of part 3 A of chapter 97 of the laws of 2011, is amended and a new subparagraph 4 (v) is added to read as follows: 5 (iv) in years in which the normal contribution rate of the New York 6 state teachers' retirement system, as defined by paragraph a of subdivi- 7 sion two of section five hundred seventeen of the education law, 8 increases by more than two percentage points from the previous year, a 9 tax levy necessary for expenditures for the coming fiscal year for local 10 government employer contributions to the New York state teachers' 11 retirement system caused by growth in the normal contribution rate minus 12 two percentage points[.]; 13 (v) a tax levy necessary for expenditures resulting from a local 14 government meeting its obligation to provide enhanced cancer disability 15 benefits to volunteer firefighters as required under section two hundred 16 five-cc of this chapter. 17 § 2. Subdivision 5 of section 3-c of the general municipal law, as 18 added by section 1 of part A of chapter 97 of the laws of 2011, is 19 amended to read as follows: 20 5. A local government may adopt a budget that requires a tax levy that 21 is greater than the tax levy limit for the coming fiscal year, not 22 including any levy necessary to support the expenditures pursuant to 23 subparagraphs (i) through [(iv)] (v) of paragraph g of subdivision two 24 of this section, only if the governing body of such local government 25 first enacts, by a vote of sixty percent of the total voting power of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09746-01-5 S. 5475 2 1 such body, a local law to override such limit for such coming fiscal 2 year only, or in the case of a district or fire district, a resolution, 3 approved by a vote of sixty percent of the total voting power of such 4 body, to override such limit for such coming fiscal year only. 5 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 6 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediate- 7 ly, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation 8 necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 9 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.